Utah statutes.
39-6-104.   Fraudulent claim against government.

(1)  A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs who, knowing it to be false or fraudulent:

(a)  makes any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer of either of them; or

(b)  presents to any person in the civil or military service, for approval or payment, any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer.

(2)  A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs, who, for the purpose of obtaining the approval, allowance, or payment of any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer of either of them:

(a)  makes or uses any writing or other paper knowing it to contain any false or fraudulent statements;

(b)  makes any oath to any fact or to any writing or other paper knowing the oath to be false; or

(c)  forges or counterfeits any signature upon any writing or other paper, or uses a signature knowing it is forged or counterfeited.

(3)  A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs who, having charge, possession, custody, or control of any money, or other property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the National Guard or any of its forces, knowingly delivers to any person authorized to receive it, any amount less than that for which he receives a certificate or receipt.

(4)  A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs, who, authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of any property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the National Guard or any of its forces, makes or delivers the writing to any person without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements contained in it and with intent to defraud the United States or the state.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

